Maryland, session 2025, HB1405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
16–202.
(E) (1) A PERSON HAS A LIEN ON A MOTOR VEHICLE IF THE PERSON TOWS
OR REMOVES THE MOTOR VEHICLE FROM A PRIVATELY OWNED PARKING LOT UNDER
TITLE 21, SUBTITLE 10A OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE ON BEHALF OF THE
PARKING LOT OWNER OR AGENT, FOR ANY CHARGE INCURRED FOR ANY:
(I) TOWING;
(II) RECOVERY;
(III) STORAGE; OR
(IV) NOTICE PROVIDED.
(2) A LIEN CREATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
EXTINGUISHED IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS RECLAIMED AND THE CHARGES GIVING
RISE TO THE LIEN ARE PAID BY:
(I) THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(II) THE LESSEE OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(III) THE OPERATOR OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(IV) THE INSURER OF RECORD;
(V) ANY SECURED PARTY; OR
(VI) ANY AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER.

HOUSE BILL 1405 3
(3) A LIEN ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
SUSPENDED IF:
(I) THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER REQUESTS AN
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
GOVERNMENT UNDER § 26–306 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE VEHICLE OWNER PROMPTLY PROVIDES A COPY OF THE
HEARING REQUEST TO THE PERSON THAT TOWED OR REMOVED THE VEHICLE.
16A–101.
(a) (1) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Police–initiated towing” has the meaning stated in § 2–314 of the
Public Safety Article.
(b) (1) EXCEPT FOR THE ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING PROCESS TO
CHALLENGE THE LEGITIMACY OF THE TOWING OF A PRIVATE MOTOR VEHICLE
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 26–306 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, Title 16 of this
article does not apply to police–initiated towing services by an authorized tow company.
(2) [Police–initiated] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION, POLICE–INITIATED towing does not create a lien or security interest for
the authorized tow company in any equipment, vehicle, or cargo.
(E) (1) AN AUTHORIZED TOW COMPANY HAS A LIEN ON A VEHICLE IF THE
AUTHORIZED TOW COMPANY PERFORMS A POLICE–INITIATED TOW ON THE VEHICLE
FOR ANY CHARGE INCURRED FOR ANY:
(I) TOWING;
(II) RECOVERY;
(III) STORAGE; OR
(IV) NOTICE PROVIDED.
(2) A LIEN CREATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
EXTINGUISHED IF THE VEHICLE IS RECLAIMED AND THE CHARGES GIVING RISE TO
THE LIEN ARE PAID BY:
(I) THE OWNER OF THE VEHICLE;

HOUSE BILL 1405
(II) THE LESSEE OF THE VEHICLE;
(III) THE OPERATOR OF THE VEHICLE;
(IV) THE INSURER OF RECORD;
(V) ANY SECURED PARTY; OR
(VI) ANY AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE VEHICLE’S OWNER.
(3) A LIEN IS CREATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION WHEN ANY
CHARGES SET OUT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION GIVING RISE TO
THE LIEN ARE INCURRED.
Article – Transportation
21–10A–02.
(b) The owner or operator of a parking lot or the owner’s or operator’s agent may
not have a vehicle towed or otherwise removed from the parking lot unless the owner,
operator, or agent has placed in conspicuous locations, as described in subsection (c) of this
section, signs that:
(1) Are at least 24 inches high and 30 inches wide;
(2) Are clearly visible to the driver of a motor vehicle entering or being
parked in the parking lot;
(3) State the location to which the vehicle will be towed or removed and the
name of the towing company;
(4) State that State law requires that the vehicle be available for
reclamation at a minimum from 6 a.m. to midnight, 7 days per week;
(5) State the maximum amount that the owner of the vehicle may be
charged for the towing or removal of the vehicle; [and]
(6) Provide the telephone number of a person who can be contacted to
arrange for the reclaiming of the vehicle by its owner or the owner’s agent; AND
(7) PROVIDE INFORMATION FOR AN OWNER TO REQUEST AN
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING IN ACCORDANCE WITH A LOCAL LAW OR REGULATION
ADOPTED UNDER § 26–306 OF THIS ARTICLE.
26–306.

HOUSE BILL 1405 5
(A) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL ESTABLISH BY LOCAL
ORDINANCE OR REGULATION AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING PROCESS BY WHICH A
MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER MAY CHALLENGE THE LEGITIMACY OF THE TOWING,
IMPOUNDMENT, OR STORAGE OF THE OWNER’S MOTOR VEHICLE.
(B) A LOCAL ORDINANCE OR REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) REQUIRE PROMPT NOTICE TO A MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER OF THE
RIGHT TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING TO CHALLENGE THE LEGITIMACY OF THE
TOWING, IMPOUNDMENT, OR STORAGE OF THE OWNER’S MOTOR VEHICLE;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, REQUIRE AN
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING TO BE HELD WITHIN 96 HOURS AFTER RECEIPT OF A
REQUEST FOR A HEARING BY AN OWNER; AND
(3) ESTABLISH INFORMATIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR SIGNAGE IN
PARKING LOTS.
(C) IF AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING REQUESTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION IS NOT HELD WITHIN 96 HOURS AFTER RECEIVING A HEARING
REQUEST, THE PERSON THAT TOWED OR REMOVED THE MOTOR VEHICLE SHALL
RELEASE THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO THE OWNER ON REQUEST AND WITHOUT CHARGE,
PENDING THE OUTCOME OF AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING REQUESTED BY THE
OWNER.
(D) THE SIGNAGE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE FOLLOWING NOTICE:
“IF YOUR VEHICLE IS TOWED, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO AN
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING TO DISPUTE THE LEGITIMACY OF THE TOW. A HEARING
MUST BE HELD WITHIN 96 HOURS OF WHEN A REQUEST FOR A HEARING IS
RECEIVED.”; AND
(2) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE INITIATION OF THE
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING PROCESS.
(E) Any State, county, or municipal corporation, or any of its agencies, which
mistakenly or otherwise wrongfully authorizes the towing, impoundment, or storage of a
privately owned motor vehicle shall reimburse the owner of the vehicle for all reasonable

HOUSE BILL 1405
towing and storage costs incurred by the owner as a result of the mistaken or wrongful
action.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.